test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-suekkj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sueʹǩǩ: # Noun a-stem 'birch/koivu' - full paradigm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sueʹǩǩ
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: suäkka
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: sueʹjjest
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Ess+Indef: sueʹǩǩen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Par+Indef: sueʹjjed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [sueʹjjtaa, sueʹjjtää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: sueʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: sueʹjji
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: sueʹjjivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [sueʹjjitaa, sueʹjjitää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: suäǥǥaž
